District of Columbia statutes.
50-1651

Helmet requirement, miscellaneous vehicles.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person under 16 years of age to ride roller skates, a skateboard, sled, coaster, toy vehicle, sidewalk bicycle, scooter, or any similar device without wearing a protective helmet of good fit, fastened securely upon the head with the straps of the helmet.

(b)

The parents or legal guardians of any child under 16 years of age found in violation of this act shall be liable for a fine of $25; provided, that the fine shall be suspended for:

(1)

First time violators; or

(2)

Violators who subsequent to the violation, but prior to the date the fine is due, purchase a helmet as described in subsection (a) of this section and provide proof of the purchase.

(c)

Any helmet offered for sale or rent for use by an operator, or passenger, of roller-skates, a skateboard, sled, coaster, toy vehicle, sidewalk bicycle, scooter, or any similar device shall meet or exceed the impact standards for protective bicycle helmets set by the American National Standards Institute, the Snell Memorial Foundation’s standards for protective headgear, or the American Society for Testing and Materials for use in bicycling.

History

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-225, § 2, 51 DCR 10537

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1652.